Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-922
Program responsibility, defined.

Program responsibility shall mean a system, area, or institution having designated statewide or regional administrative, planning, and academic responsibility for a general or specific program area.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 6.